Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Chapter 3

Flood Control Authorities

64-3-101. Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Determination and effectuation of the best means for control of the flood waters of the waterways of Tennessee are public purposes essential to the integrated economic development of the areas drained by such streams and waterways and to the future economic welfare of the entire state;

Control of flood waters in the watershed of Mill Creek located in Davidson, Williamson and Rutherford counties by a local development authority will provide information on problems of water control and development; and

Creation of a local development authority is essential to the achievement of these objectives in the watershed of Mill Creek in Davidson, Williamson and Rutherford Counties.

Acts 1980, ch. 897, § 1; T.C.A., §66-3-101.

Cross-References. Power of municipalities in flood control, title 7, ch. 32.

64-3-102. Creation of authority — Purposes.

There is hereby created the Mill Creek watershed flood control authority, referred to as authority in this chapter, to exercise the powers granted in this chapter in and with respect to the portions of Davidson, Williamson and Rutherford counties making up the watershed of Mill Creek and for the purpose of cooperating with the United States corps of engineers and other federal agencies, including the Tennessee Valley authority, and state and local agencies for the construction and maintenance of flood control and drainage.

Acts 1980, ch. 897, § 2; T.C.A., §66-3-102.

64-3-103. Board of directors — Officers and employees — Expenses — Quorum.

The authority shall be a body politic and corporate.

Subject to approval of the respective local legislative body as provided in § 64-3-106, the authority shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of the following persons to represent their respective counties, if such county legislative body has approved this chapter:

The county mayor of Williamson County, the county mayor of Rutherford County and the metropolitan mayor from metropolitan Nashville-Davidson County as ex officio voting members; and

Six (6) additional members who are residents and owners of real property in such watershed district to be appointed by the county mayor of the respective county as follows: three (3) persons from Davidson County; two (2) persons from Williamson County; and one (1) person from Rutherford County. The terms of such members shall be four (4) years, except that for the initial appointments, two (2) members shall be appointed for two (2) years, two (2) members for three (3) years, and two (2) members for four (4) years. All initial terms shall begin on July 1, 1980, and all subsequent terms shall commence on the expiration date of such previous term. Each member shall serve until the member's successor is appointed and qualified. A person appointed to fill a vacancy shall be appointed for the unexpired term by the respective county mayor when such a vacancy occurs.

The board of directors of the authority shall elect a chair from its members, whose term shall be for four (4) years or for so long as the chair remains a member of the board. The board may elect such other officers as it deems necessary.

The directors shall serve without pay except for actual traveling expenses and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties, such expenses to be reimbursed from such funds as may be available to the authority.

Five (5) members of the board or a majority of members to which the board is entitled by this chapter shall constitute a quorum, and no action binding the board shall become effective unless approved by such majority. No action binding the board shall become effective unless approved by five (5) affirmative votes.

The board may employ an executive secretary and such other persons as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes stated in this chapter, and the salary of any such employees may be paid out of such funds as may be available to the authority from any source.

The executive secretary shall be the custodian of funds belonging to the authority and shall keep such records and accounts as may be required by the board. The executive secretary shall also execute a corporate surety bond as prescribed by the board.

Acts 1980, ch. 897, § 3; T.C.A., §66-3-103; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

64-3-104. Powers and duties.

The authority is hereby specifically authorized and empowered to do any and all things necessary or desirable in forming and executing a comprehensive plan for controlling the flooding of the Mill Creek watershed, including, but not limited to, action in cooperation, when necessary or desirable, with appropriate local, state and federal agencies in prosecuting adopted and authorized projects for the construction of dams, floodways, drainage canals, reservoirs, channel rectification and other flood control and drainage works within the Mill Creek watershed to prevent losses caused by flooding. To that end, the authority:

Shall have succession in its corporate name;

May sue and be sued in its corporate name;

May adopt and use a corporate seal;

May establish, amend and repeal bylaws and make all rules and regulations deemed expedient for the management of its corporate affairs and to accomplish the purposes of this chapter;

May make contracts, conveyances, mortgages, deeds of trust, bonds or leases and execute instruments containing such terms, provisions and conditions as in the judgment of the board may be necessary, proper or advisable in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it in this section, including, but not limited to, contracts for grants, loans or other assistance from any federal agency or other agency or person and contracts with corporations, associations or individuals for construction work in the furtherance of any project and may carry out and perform the terms and conditions of all such contracts or instruments;

May acquire by purchase, lease, devise, gift or by condemnation property of any kind, real, personal or mixed, or any interest therein, for the control of floodwaters as provided in this chapter, and such condemnation authority shall be narrowly construed in accordance with the effect and intent of this chapter;

May issue its bonds and bond anticipation notes from time to time in a total amount not to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the purpose of paying in whole or in part the cost of the acquisition of necessary land or interest in land and expenses incidental to the acquisition;

May secure such bonds and bond anticipation notes by a pledge of all or any part of the revenues that may now or hereafter come to the authority from any source by a mortgage or deed of trust of the authority's land or any part thereof, or by a combination of the two (2); and

May make such contracts or covenants in the issuance of such bonds and bond anticipation notes as may be necessary to ensure the marketability thereof;

Shall require all bonds issued under the authority of this chapter to be under the management and supervision of the department of economic and community development;

May arrange with any county, municipality, metropolitan government or supplier of utilities for the abandonment, relocation or other adjustment of roads, railroads, highways, bridges and utility lines; and

Shall have the final authority and power to disallow development within the one-hundred-year floodplain along Mill Creek.

The authority's power of eminent domain may be exercised pursuant to title 29, chapter 16 or pursuant to any other applicable statutory provisions now in force or hereafter enacted for the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

As an alternative to the eminent domain procedures pursuant to subdivision (b)(1), the authority may file in the court where condemnation proceedings of the authority are pending an application for a writ of possession, which the court shall, upon the authority's posting a bond with the clerk of the court in such amount as the court may deem commensurate with the value of the property condemned, order that a writ of possession shall issue immediately or as soon and upon such terms as the court, in its discretion, may deem proper and just.

During the time that title to land or rights in land are held by the authority, it shall be exempt from all taxes levied by the state or any of its political subdivisions, or instrumentalities of either; and all other property and activities of the authority shall be similarly exempt.

Acts 1980, ch. 897, § 4; T.C.A., §66-3-104.

64-3-105. Contributions by local governments authorized.

Davidson, Williamson and Rutherford counties, and any municipality or metropolitan government in such counties, are hereby authorized and empowered to contribute to the work of the Mill Creek watershed flood control authority any amount or amounts as recommended by the authority that their respective governing bodies, acting in their sole discretion, shall approve, to be paid either from the general fund of the respective county or municipality or metropolitan government, or from a special ad valorem tax that such legislative bodies are hereby empowered to levy and collect for such purposes, which are hereby declared to be for municipal and county public purposes.

Acts 1980, ch. 897, § 6; T.C.A., §66-3-106.

64-3-106. Participation by counties — Withdrawal.

This chapter applies to Williamson, Rutherford and Metropolitan Nashville-Davidson counties for the purpose of implementing the programs established in this chapter, and any or all of these counties are hereby expressly authorized by the general assembly to participate in the programs established. However, prior to participation in such programs, the county legislative bodies of such counties shall express their desire to participate in the programs by means of a resolution to that effect, passed by each or all of the respective local legislative bodies of the counties involved. The resolution shall be approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of such legislative bodies within one hundred twenty (120) days of July 1, 1980.

Any county to which this chapter applies that has elected or elects to participate in the programs authorized by the chapter may withdraw from participation therein by resolution to that effect adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body of such county. However, such withdrawal does not relieve such county of any of its then existing obligation on account of bonds or other evidence of indebtedness incurred by such county on account of its participation in the programs of the authority, and such obligation shall continue until discharged by the county.

Acts 1980, ch. 897, § 7; T.C.A., §66-3-107.

64-3-107. Public hearings — Notice — Procedure.

At least sixty (60) days before any contract is let or work begun upon any plan, improvement or project within the watershed of Mill Creek, which would result in the condemnation of any land, as provided in this chapter, a public hearing shall be held. Notice of the public hearing shall be by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in each of Davidson, Williamson and Rutherford counties. The publication shall be run once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks, the last of which shall be at least ten (10) days before the date set for the hearing. The notice shall generally contain the nature and scope of the proposed project, the estimated cost, the proposed method for the payment of the cost and the time and place of the hearing and shall notify the interested persons and landowners to appear and show cause why such project should not be approved and performed and of their right to be represented by counsel.

The hearing required by this chapter may be conducted by the chair of the authority or by hearing examiners designated by such chair who shall conduct such hearings in the name of such authority.

Opportunity shall be afforded all parties to respond in person or by attorney and present evidence and argument on all issues involved.

A record of the proceedings and of those who testify shall be taken and preserved. The record shall be made available on request to any person upon payment of a reasonable charge to cover the costs of preparation.

Findings of fact shall be based exclusively on the evidence and on matters officially noticed.

Acts 1980, ch. 897, § 8; T.C.A., §66-3-108.

64-3-108. Effect on other laws.

The provisions of any other law, general, special or local, except as provided in this chapter, do not apply to the authority incorporated under this chapter; and, where such laws may be in conflict with the provisions hereof, this chapter shall be controlling. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as impairing the powers and duties of the department of environment and conservation of this state or any department of the United States soil conservation agency or its districts or agents.

Acts 1980, ch. 897, § 5; T.C.A., §66-3-105.